Utah statutes.
53C-2-105.   Withdrawal of trust lands from leasing or other dispositions.

The director may at any time withdraw trust lands from:

(1)  applications for leasing, permitting, sale, or other disposition of any nature upon a finding that the interests of the trust would best be served through withdrawal; or

(2)  surface occupancy or use upon a finding that continued use would cause resource degradation.

